Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 123B.09, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Student representation. The school board deleted text begin is encouraged todeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end adopt a process to include student representation to advise the school board. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end